Hawaii statutes.
[§841-14.5] Performance of autopsy by
pathologist. An autopsy of a deceased person under this chapter shall be
performed by an anatomic or forensic pathologist certified as such by the
American Board of Pathology. [L 1987, c 23, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next